Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article V, section 2, will read: new text end Sec. 2. The term of office for the governor and lieutenant governor is four years and until a successor is chosen and qualified. Each shall have attained the age of 25 years and, shall have been a bona fide resident of the state for one year next preceding his election, and shall be a citizen of the United States.new text begin A person must not be elected more than twice to the office of governor, nor more than twice to the office of lieutenant governor.new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to place a limit of two terms on the offices of governor and lieutenant governor beginning in 2030? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, the title for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) shall be "A constitutional amendment to place term limits on the offices of governor and lieutenant governor." new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPLICABILITY.new text end new text begin Elections prior to the 2030 general election must not be used for purposes of applying the term limits imposed by the amendment in this act. new text end